Tennessee, session 114, HB0381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-4-205, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) The commission shall produce an annual report listing the persons convicted
under this section in the previous year and file such report with the chair of the state and
local government committee of the senate and the chair of the committee having
jurisdiction over consumption of alcoholic beverages on premises in the house of
representatives. The first report must include all convictions since this section became
law and be filed no later than December 1, 2025. All subsequent reports must be filed
no later than December 1 each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0381
000831
- 1 -